Utah statutes.
75-5-401.   Protective proceedings.
(1)  Upon petition and after notice and hearing in accordance with the
provisions of this part, the court may appoint a conservator or make other
protective order for cause as follows:
(a)  Appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in
relation to the estate and affairs of a minor if the court determines that a
minor owns money or property that requires management or protection which
cannot otherwise be provided, has or may have business affairs which may be
jeopardized or prevented by minority, or that funds are needed for the minor's
support and education and protection is necessary or desirable to obtain or
provide funds.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (1)(a) may be applied to a person beyond
minority up to age 21 under special circumstances as determined by the court.
(2)  Appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in
relation to the estate and affairs of a person if the court determines that
the person:
(a)  is unable to manage the person's property and affairs effectively for
reasons such as mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or
disability, chronic use of drugs, chronic intoxication, confinement, detention
by a foreign power, or disappearance; and
(b)  has property which will be wasted or dissipated unless proper management
is provided or that funds are needed for the support, care, and welfare of the
person or those entitled to be supported by the person and protection is
necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds.
(3)  Appointment of a conservator or other protective order may not be denied
solely on the basis that the person for whom the conservatorship or other
protective order is sought has a valid power of attorney in effect.
